fst/nom_paradigms.lexc
! Paradigm 56 — gigānts (masc consonant: stem = lemma - "s")
LEXICON N56_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:is     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:i      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:in     # ;
LEXICON N56_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:ei     # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:jai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:in     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:imans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:ins    # ;

! Paradigm 57 — dānts (masc consonant: stem = lemma - "s")
LEXICON N57_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:is     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:i      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:in     # ;
LEXICON N57_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:ei     # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:jai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:in     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:immans # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:ins    # ;

! Paradigm 60 — aks (fem consonant: stem = lemma - "s")
LEXICON N60_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:s       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:is      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:ei      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:in      # ;
LEXICON N60_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:is      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:in      # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:imans   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:ins     # ;

! Paradigm 61 — kērmens (masc n-stem: stem = lemma - "s")
LEXICON N61_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:es     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:i      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:in     # ;
LEXICON N61_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:ei     # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:jai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:in     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:imans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:ins    # ;

! Paradigm 33 — šmaws (u-stem, stem allomorphy: full forms)
LEXICON N33
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:šmaws      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:šmāuwas    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:šmāuwu     # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:šmāuwan    # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:šmāuwai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:šmāuwan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:šmāumans   # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:šmāuamans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:šmāuwans   # ;

! Paradigm 39 — rikīs (ī-stem, stem allomorphy: full forms)
LEXICON N39
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:Rikīs      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:Rikijjas   # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:Rikijju    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:Rikijjan   # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:Rikijjai   # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:Rikijjan   # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:Rikkijmans # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:Rikkimans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:Rikijjans  # ;

! ============================================================
! ADDITIONAL PARADIGMS (iotation, pronouns, adjectives)
! ============================================================

! 11 — stas (Pron)
LEXICON P11
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:stan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:stessei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:stesses  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:stāi  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:stans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:stēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:stēisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:stās  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:stan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:stesmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:stesse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:stas  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:stans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:stēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:stēisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:stāi  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:sta  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:stesmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:stesse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:sta  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:sta  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:stesmu  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:stesse  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:sta  # ;

! 14 — tennan (Pron)
LEXICON P14
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:tennan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:tenesmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:tenesse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:tennan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:tennans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:tenēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:tenēisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:tenēi  # ;

! 16 — subs (Pron)
LEXICON P16
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:subban  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:subsei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:subses  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:subba  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:subbans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:subbeimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:subbeisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:subbas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:subban  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:subsmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:subse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:subs  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:subbans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:subbeimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:subbeisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:subbai  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:subban  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:subsmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:subse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:subban  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:subban  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:subsmu  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:subse  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:subban  # ;

! 18 — kits (Pron)
LEXICON P18
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:kittan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:kitsei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:kitses  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:kitā  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:kittans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:kitans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:kitēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:kitēisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:kittas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:kittan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:kitsmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:kitse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:kits  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:kittans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:kitēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:kitēisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:kitāi  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:kittan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:kitsmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:kitse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:kittan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:kittan  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:kitsmu  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:kitse  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:kittan  # ;

! 21 — aīns (Pron)
LEXICON P21
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:aīnan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:ainassei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:ainasses  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:ainā  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:aīnans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:aināmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:aīnan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:aīnas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:aīnan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:ainasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:ainasse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:aīns  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:aīnans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:ainammans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:aīnan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:aināi  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:aīnan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:ainasmu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Neut:aīnasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:ainasse  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Neut:aīnase  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:aīnan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:aīnan  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:aīnasmu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:ainasmu  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:ainasse  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:aīnan  # ;

! 23 — dwāi (Pron)
LEXICON Num23
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:dwāi  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:dwēimas  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:dwejjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:dwāi  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:dwāi  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:dwēimas  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:dwejjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:dwāi  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:dwāi  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:dwēimas  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:dwejjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:dwāi  # ;

! 24 — trīs (Pron)
LEXICON Num24
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:trins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:trimmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:trijjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:trīs  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:trins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:trimmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:trijjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:trīs  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:trins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:trimmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:trijjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:trīs  # ;

! 28 — māldaisis (Adj)
LEXICON A28
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:māldaisin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:māldaisjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:māldaišu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:māldaisju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:māldaišas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:māldaisjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:māldaisis  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:māldaisins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:māldaisjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:māldaišamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:māldaisjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:māldaisin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:māldaisjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:māldaišai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:māldaisjai  # ;

! 29 — sēnts (Adj)
LEXICON A29
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:swintan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:swentan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:swintai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:swentai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:swintas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:swentas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:swinta  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:swenta  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:swintans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:swentans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:swintamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:swentamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:swintan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:swentan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:swintas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:swentas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:swintan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:swentan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:swintasmu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:swentasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:swintas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:swentas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:swints  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Masc:swents  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:swintans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:swentans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:swintamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:swentamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:swintan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:swentan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:swintai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:swentai  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:swintan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Neut:swentan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:swintasmu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Neut:swentasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:swintas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Neut:swentas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:swintan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Neut:swentan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:swintans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:swentans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:swintamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:swentamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:swintan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Neut:swentan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:swintai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Neut:swentai  # ;

! 30 — āngus (Adj)
LEXICON A30
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:āngin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:āngjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:āngei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:āngjai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:ānges  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:āngjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:āngi  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:āngins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:āngjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:āngemans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:āngjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:āngin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:āngjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:ānges  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:āngjas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:āngun  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:āngusmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:āngwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:āngus  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:ānguns  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:āngumans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:āngun  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:āngwai  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:āngu  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:āngusmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:āngwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:āngu  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:ānguns  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:āngumans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:āngun  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:āngwai  # ;

! 30a — stāws (Adj)
LEXICON A30a
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:stāwin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:stāwan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:stāwjai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:stāwai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:stāwjas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:stāwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:stāwi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:stāwa  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:stāwins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:stāwans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:stāwjamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:stāwamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:stāwin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:stāwan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:stāwjas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:stāwas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:stāwun  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:stāwan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:stāwusmu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:stāwasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:staūwas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:stāwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:stāws  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:stāwuns  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:stāwans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:stāwumans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:stāwamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:stāwun  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:stāwan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:staūwai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:stāwai  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:stāwu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Neut:stāwan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:stāwusmu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Neut:stāwasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:staūwas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Neut:stāwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:stāwu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Neut:stāwan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:stāwuns  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:stāwans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:stāwumans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:stāwamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:stāwun  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Neut:stāwan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:staūwai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Neut:stāwai  # ;
